Washington statutes.
RCW 36.92.070

Charges for services—Duties of county treasurer.

The board of county commissioners shall fix the terms and charges for services rendered by the central services department pursuant to this chapter, which amounts shall be credited as income to the appropriate account within the central services fund and charged on a monthly basis against the account of the recipient for whom such services were performed. Moneys derived from the activities of the central services department shall be disbursed from the central services fund by the county treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the board.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 103 s 8.]